Utah, session 2026, HB72.
Section 1. Section 13-2-1 is amended to read:13-2-1Effective 05/06/26Superseded 07/01/26. Consumer protection division established -- Functions.(1)There is established within the Department of Commerce the Division of Consumer Protection.(2)The division shall administer and enforce the following:(a)Chapter 10a, Music Licensing Practices Act;(b)Chapter 11, Utah Consumer Sales Practices Act;(c)Chapter 15, Business Opportunity Disclosure Act;(d)Chapter 20, New Motor Vehicle Warranties Act;(e)Chapter 21, Credit Services Organizations Act;(f)Chapter 22, Charitable Solicitations Act;(g)Chapter 23, Health Spa Services Protection Act;(h)Chapter 25a, Telephone and Facsimile Solicitation Act;(i)Chapter 26, Telephone Fraud Prevention Act;(j)Chapter 28, Prize Notices Regulation Act;(k)Chapter 32a, Pawnshop, Secondhand Merchandise, and Catalytic Converter Transaction Information Act;(l)Chapter 34, Utah Postsecondary School and State Authorization Act;(m)Chapter 41, Price Controls During Emergencies Act;(n)Chapter 42, Uniform Debt-Management Services Act;(o)Chapter 49, Immigration Consultants Registration Act;(p)Chapter 51, Transportation Network Company Registration Act;(q)Chapter 52, Residential Solar Energy Consumer Protection Act;(r)Chapter 53, Residential, Vocational orand Life Skills Program Act;(s)Chapter 54, Ticket Website Sales Act;(t)Chapter 56, Ticket Transferability Act;(u)Chapter 57, Maintenance Funding Practices Act;(v)Chapter 61, Utah Consumer Privacy Act;(w)Chapter 64, Vehicle Value Protection Agreement Act;(x)Chapter 65, Utah Commercial Email Act;(y)Chapter 67, Online Dating Safety Act; (z)Chapter 68, Lawyer Referral Consultants Registration Act;(aa)Chapter 70, Automatic Renewal Contracts Act;(bb)Chapter 71, Utah Minor Protection in Social Media Act;(cc)Chapter 72a, Artificial Intelligence Applications Relating to Mental Health; and(dd)Chapter 78, Earned Wage Access Services Act.; and(ee)Chapter 82, Virtual Currency Kiosk Regulation.(3)In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the division may make rules to establish:(a)a public list that identifies a person that:(i)violates a chapter described in Subsection (2);(ii)without proper legal justification, fails to comply with an order, subpoena, judgment, or other legal process issued by:(A)the division; or(B)a court of competent jurisdiction; or(iii)breaches a settlement agreement, stipulation, assurance of voluntary compliance, or similar instrument signed by the person and the division; and(b)a process by which a person may be removed from the list the division establishes as described in Subsection (3)(a).

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 13-2-1 is amended to read:13-2-1Effective 07/01/26. Consumer protection division established -- Functions.(1)There is established within the Department of Commerce the Division of Consumer Protection.(2)The division shall administer and enforce the following:(a)Chapter 10a, Music Licensing Practices Act;(b)Chapter 11, Utah Consumer Sales Practices Act;(c)Chapter 15, Business Opportunity Disclosure Act;(d)Chapter 20, New Motor Vehicle Warranties Act;(e)Chapter 21, Credit Services Organizations Act;(f)Chapter 22, Charitable Solicitations Act;(g)Chapter 23, Health Spa Services Protection Act;(h)Chapter 25a, Telephone and Facsimile Solicitation Act;(i)Chapter 26, Telephone Fraud Prevention Act;(j)Chapter 28, Prize Notices Regulation Act;(k)Chapter 32a, Pawnshop, Secondhand Merchandise, and Catalytic Converter Transaction Information Act;(l)Chapter 34, Utah Postsecondary School and State Authorization Act;(m)Chapter 41, Price Controls During Emergencies Act;(n)Chapter 42, Uniform Debt-Management Services Act;(o)Chapter 49, Immigration Consultants Registration Act;(p)Chapter 51, Transportation Network Company Registration Act;(q)Chapter 52, Residential Solar Energy Consumer Protection Act;(r)Chapter 53, Residential, Vocational orand Life Skills Program Act;(s)Chapter 54, Ticket Website Sales Act;(t)Chapter 56, Ticket Transferability Act;(u)Chapter 57, Maintenance Funding Practices Act;(v)Chapter 61, Utah Consumer Privacy Act;(w)Chapter 64, Vehicle Value Protection Agreement Act;(x)Chapter 65, Utah Commercial Email Act;(y)Chapter 67, Online Dating Safety Act; (z)Chapter 68, Lawyer Referral Consultants Registration Act;(aa)Chapter 70, Automatic Renewal Contracts Act;(bb)Chapter 71, Utah Minor Protection in Social Media Act;(cc)Chapter 72a, Artificial Intelligence Applications Relating to Mental Health;(dd)Chapter 78, Earned Wage Access Services Act; and(ee)Chapter 81, Utah Digital Choice Act.; and(ff)Chapter 82, Virtual Currency Kiosk Regulation.(3)In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the division may make rules to establish:(a)a public list that identifies a person that:(i)violates a chapter described in Subsection (2);(ii)without proper legal justification, fails to comply with an order, subpoena, judgment, or other legal process issued by:(A)the division; or(B)a court of competent jurisdiction; or(iii)breaches a settlement agreement, stipulation, assurance of voluntary compliance, or similar instrument signed by the person and the division; and(b)a process by which a person may be removed from the list the division establishes as described in Subsection (3)(a).

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 13-11-4 is amended to read:13-11-4Effective 05/06/26. Deceptive act or practice by supplier.(1)A supplier that engages in a deceptive act or practice in connection with a consumer transaction violates this chapter, whether the deceptive act or practice occurs before, during, or after the transaction.(2)Without limiting the scope of Subsection (1), a supplier commits a deceptive act or practice if the supplier:(a)indicates that the subject of a consumer transaction has sponsorship, approval, performance characteristics, accessories, uses, or benefits, if the subject has not;(b)indicates that the subject of a consumer transaction is of a particular standard, quality, grade, style, or model, if the subject is not;(c)indicates that the subject of a consumer transaction is new, or unused, if the subject is not, or has been used to an extent that is materially different from the fact;(d)indicates that the subject of a consumer transaction is available to the consumer for a reason that does not exist, including any of the following reasons falsely used in an advertisement:(i)"going out of business";(ii)"bankruptcy sale";(iii)"lost our lease";(iv)"building coming down";(v)"forced out of business";(vi)"final days";(vii)"liquidation sale";(viii)"fire sale";(ix)"quitting business"; or(x)an expression similar to any of the expressions in Subsections (2)(d)(i) through (ix);(e)indicates that the subject of a consumer transaction has been supplied in accordance with a previous representation, if the subject has not;(f)indicates that the subject of a consumer transaction will be supplied in greater quantity than the supplier intends;(g)indicates that replacement or repair is needed, if the replacement or repair is not;(h)indicates that a specific price advantage exists, if the specific price advantage does not;(i)indicates that the supplier has a sponsorship, approval, license, certification, or affiliation the supplier does not have;(j)(i)indicates that a consumer transaction involves or does not involve a warranty, a disclaimer of warranties, particular warranty terms, or other rights, remedies, or obligations, if the representation is false; or(ii)fails to honor a warranty or a particular warranty term;(k)indicates that the consumer will receive a rebate, discount, or other benefit as an inducement for entering into a consumer transaction in return for giving the supplier the names of prospective consumers or otherwise helping the supplier to enter into other consumer transactions, if receipt of the benefit is contingent on an event occurring after the consumer enters into the transaction;(l)after receipt of payment for goods or services, fails to ship the goods or furnish the services within the time advertised or otherwise represented or, if no specific time is advertised or represented, fails to ship the goods or furnish the services within 30 days, unless within the applicable time period the supplier provides the buyer with the option to:(i)cancel the sales agreement and receive a refund of all previous payments to the supplier if the refund is mailed or delivered to the buyer within 10 business days after the day on which the seller receives written notification from the buyer of the buyer's intent to cancel the sales agreement and receive the refund; or(ii)extend the shipping date to a specific date proposed by the supplier;(m)except as provided in Subsection (3)(b), fails to furnish a notice meeting the requirements of Subsection (3)(a) of the purchaser's right to cancel a direct solicitation sale within three business days of the time of purchase if:(i)the sale is made other than at the supplier's established place of business pursuant to the supplier's personal contact, whether through mail, electronic mail, facsimile transmission, telephone, or any other form of direct solicitation; and(ii)the sale price exceeds $25;(n)promotes, offers, or grants participation in a pyramid scheme as defined under Title 76, Chapter 6a, Pyramid Scheme ActChapter 17, Part 3, Offenses Concerning Pyramid Schemes;(o)in connection with a charitable solicitation:(i)falsely indicates that:(A)the supplier is affiliated with a charitable organization;(B)the supplier is an employee, officer, or representative of a public safety agency;(C)the supplier has sponsorship or approval of a given charitable organization;(D)a charitable contribution will be provided to a given charitable organization;(E)providing a charitable contribution has an additional benefit, including a tax benefit; or(F)the recipient of the solicitation has previously contributed to a given charitable organization;(ii)uses a fictitious name or a name the supplier is not authorized to use; or(iii)with intent to deceive:(A)uses a name that is substantially similar to that of another charitable organization; or(B)falsely indicates that a charitable contribution will be used for a particular purpose;(p)if a consumer indicates the consumer's intention of making a claim for a motor vehicle repair against the consumer's motor vehicle insurance policy:(i)commences the repair without first giving the consumer oral and written notice of:(A)the total estimated cost of the repair; and(B)the total dollar amount the consumer is responsible to pay for the repair, which dollar amount may not exceed the applicable deductible or other copay arrangement in the consumer's insurance policy; or(ii)requests or collects from a consumer an amount that exceeds the dollar amount a consumer was initially told the consumer was responsible to pay as an insurance deductible or other copay arrangement for a motor vehicle repair under Subsection (2)(p)(i), even if that amount is less than the full amount the motor vehicle insurance policy requires the insured to pay as a deductible or other copay arrangement, unless:(A)the consumer's insurance company denies that coverage exists for the repair, in which case, the full amount of the repair may be charged and collected from the consumer; or(B)the consumer misstates, before the repair is commenced, the amount of money the insurance policy requires the consumer to pay as a deductible or other copay arrangement, in which case, the supplier may charge and collect from the consumer an amount that does not exceed the amount the insurance policy requires the consumer to pay as a deductible or other copay arrangement;(q)includes in any contract, receipt, or other written documentation of a consumer transaction, or any addendum to any contract, receipt, or other written documentation of a consumer transaction, any confession of judgment or any waiver of any of the rights to which a consumer is entitled under this chapter;(r)charges a consumer for a consumer transaction or a portion of a consumer transaction that has not previously been agreed to by the consumer;(s)solicits or enters into a consumer transaction with an individual who lacks the mental ability to comprehend the nature and consequences of:(i)the consumer transaction; or(ii)the individual's ability to benefit from the consumer transaction;(t)solicits for the sale of a product or service by providing a consumer with an unsolicited check or negotiable instrument the presentment or negotiation of which obligates the consumer to purchase a product or service, unless the supplier is:(i)a depository institution under Section 7-1-103;(ii)an affiliate of a depository institution; or(iii)an entity regulated under Title 7, Financial Institutions Act;(u)sends an unsolicited mailing to a person that appears to be a billing, statement, or request for payment for a product or service the person has not ordered or used, or that implies that the mailing requests payment for an ongoing product or service the person has not received or requested;(v)issues a gift certificate, instrument, or other record in exchange for payment to provide the bearer, upon presentation, goods or services in a specified amount without printing in a readable manner on the gift certificate, instrument, packaging, or record any expiration date or information concerning a fee to be charged and deducted from the balance of the gift certificate, instrument, or other record;(w)misrepresents the geographical origin or location of the supplier's business;(x)fails to comply with the restrictions of Section 15-10-201 on automatic renewal provisions;(y)violates Section 13-59-201; (z)fails to comply with the restrictions of Subsection 13-54-202(2);(aa)states or implies that a registration or application administered or enforced by the division is an endorsement, sanction, or approval by the division or a governmental agency or office; or(bb)fails to comply with the requirements of Section 71A-4-102 regarding assistance to veterans for benefits.; or(cc)fails to comply with the requirements of Chapter 82, Virtual Currency Kiosk Regulation.(3)(a)The notice required by Subsection (2)(m) shall:(i)be a conspicuous statement written in dark bold with at least 12-point type on the first page of the purchase documentation; and(ii)read as follows: "YOU, THE BUYER, MAY CANCEL THIS CONTRACT AT ANY TIME PRIOR TO MIDNIGHT OF THE THIRD BUSINESS DAY (or time period reflecting the supplier's cancellation policy but not less than three business days) AFTER THE DATE OF THE TRANSACTION OR RECEIPT OF THE PRODUCT, WHICHEVER IS LATER."(b)A supplier is exempt from the requirements of Subsection (2)(m) if the supplier's cancellation policy:(i)is communicated to the buyer; and(ii)offers greater rights to the buyer than Subsection (2)(m).(4)(a)A gift certificate, instrument, or other record that does not print an expiration date in accordance with Subsection (2)(v) does not expire.(b)A gift certificate, instrument, or other record that does not include printed information concerning a fee to be charged and deducted from the balance of the gift certificate, instrument, or other record is not subject to the charging and deduction of the fee.(c)Subsections (2)(v) and (4)(b) do not apply to a gift certificate, instrument, or other record useable at multiple, unaffiliated sellers of goods or services if an expiration date is printed on the gift certificate, instrument, or other record.

Section 4:
Section 4. Section 13-82-101 is enacted to read:82. Virtual Currency Kiosk Regulation13-82-101Effective 05/06/26. Definitions.As used in this chapter:(1)"Transaction hash" means a unique identifier made up of a string of characters that act as a record and provide proof the transaction was verified and added to the blockchain.(2)"Virtual currency" means a digital representation of value that is used as a medium of exchange, unit of account, or store of value and is not money, whether or not denominated in money.(3)"Virtual currency address" means an alphanumeric identifier associated with a virtual currency wallet identifying the location to which a virtual currency transaction may be sent.(4)"Virtual currency kiosk" means an electronic terminal acting as a mechanical agent of the virtual currency kiosk operator to enable the virtual currency kiosk operator to facilitate the exchange of virtual currency for money, bank credit, or other virtual currency.(5)"Virtual currency kiosk operator" means a person that operates a virtual currency kiosk in this state.(6)"Virtual currency kiosk transaction" means a transaction conducted or performed, in whole or in part, by electronic means via a virtual currency kiosk to purchase virtual currency with fiat currency or to sell virtual currency for fiat currency.(7)"Virtual currency wallet" means a software application or other mechanism providing a means to hold, store, or transfer virtual currency.

Section 5:
Section 5. Section 13-82-102 is enacted to read:13-82-102Effective 05/06/26. Transaction limits.(1)A virtual currency kiosk operator may not accept virtual currency kiosk transactions from a single customer that exceed a cumulative total of:(a)during the three calendar days following the day on which the customer completes the customer's first virtual currency kiosk transaction with the virtual currency kiosk operator, $2,000 of cash or the equivalent in virtual currency per calendar day; or(b)after the three-day period described in Subsection (1)(a), $5,000 of cash or the equivalent in virtual currency per calendar day.(2)Subsection (1) applies to virtual currency kiosk transactions in this state via one or more virtual currency kiosks operated by the same virtual currency kiosk operator.

Section 6:
Section 6. Section 13-82-103 is enacted to read:13-82-103Effective 05/06/26. Disclosures and warnings -- Receipt requirements.(1)A virtual currency kiosk operator shall disclose in a clear, conspicuous, and easily readable manner in the chosen language of the customer:(a)all relevant terms and conditions generally associated with the products, services, and activities of the virtual currency kiosk operator and virtual currency; and(b)that digital assets and transactions conducted through the virtual currency kiosk are not insured or guaranteed by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or the Securities Investor Protection Corporation.(2)The virtual currency kiosk operator shall receive acknowledgment of receipt of all disclosures required under this section via confirmation of consent.(3)Each virtual currency kiosk shall include a fraud prevention warning in English and Spanish, written prominently and in bold type.(4)The fraud prevention warning described in Subsection (3) shall state: "WARNING: NEVER SEND MONEY TO SOMEONE YOU DO NOT KNOW. THESE TRANSACTIONS ARE IRREVERSIBLE. NO GOVERNMENT AGENCY OR OFFICIAL WILL EVER REQUEST PAYMENT USING THIS KIOSK. IF YOU SUSPECT FRAUD, CALL LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT BEFORE PROCEEDING."(5)After the completion of each transaction, the virtual currency kiosk operator shall provide an individual with a receipt in the language chosen by the customer.(6)The receipt described in Subsection (5) shall contain:(a)the virtual currency kiosk operator's name and contact information, including a telephone number to answer questions and register complaints;(b)the relevant state law enforcement or government agency for reporting fraud;(c)the type, value, date, and precise time of the transaction;(d)the transaction hash;(e)each applicable virtual currency address;(f)the transaction amount in both virtual currency and United States dollars;(g)all fees charged;(h)the exchange rate of the virtual currency to United States dollars;(i)customer service contact information; and(j)a statement of the virtual currency kiosk operator's refund policy.(7)A virtual currency kiosk operator performing business in this state shall provide a toll-free customer service line, available 24 hours per day, seven days per week, and display the number for the toll-free customer service line on the virtual currency kiosk or the virtual currency kiosk screens.

Section 7:
Section 7. Section 13-82-104 is enacted to read:13-82-104Effective 05/06/26. Recordkeeping and law enforcement cooperation.(1)Each virtual currency kiosk operator shall maintain complete and accurate records of all virtual currency kiosk transactions and related customer information as required under applicable state and federal law.(2)At a minimum, the records described in Subsection (1) shall be preserved for the period of time required by:(a)rules made by the division under Section 13-82-106; or(b)other applicable law.(3)A virtual currency kiosk operator shall cooperate with law enforcement authorities in the investigation and prevention of fraud and other unlawful activity, including:(a)promptly complying with lawful subpoenas, court orders, and other official requests for records or information relating to virtual currency kiosk transactions or customers;(b)responding in good faith to lawful requests from the division or law enforcement relating to fraud involving a virtual currency kiosk; and(c)designating a point of contact within the operator's organization for communication with the division and law enforcement regarding fraud-related matters.(4)Upon request by the division, a virtual currency kiosk operator shall make the operator's records available to the division for examination or audit to verify compliance with this chapter.

Section 8:
Section 8. Section 13-82-105 is enacted to read:13-82-105Effective 05/06/26. Annual location reporting.(1)Each virtual currency kiosk operator shall submit to the division an annual report listing all virtual currency kiosk locations operated by the operator in this state.(2)The report described in Subsection (1) shall be:(a)filed in accordance with rules made by the division under Section 13-82-106; and(b)filed at least once per calendar year.(3)The report described in Subsection (1) shall include, for each virtual currency kiosk location:(a)the name of the business or establishment where the virtual currency kiosk is located;(b)the physical address of the location, including street address, city, and ZIP code;(c)the date on which the virtual currency kiosk began operation at that location; and(d)if applicable, the date on which the virtual currency kiosk ceased operation at that location.(4)In addition to the annual report required under Subsection (1), a virtual currency kiosk operator shall notify the division within 30 days after:(a)installing a new virtual currency kiosk at a location in this state; or(b)removing a virtual currency kiosk from a location in this state.

Section 9:
Section 9. Section 13-82-106 is enacted to read:13-82-106Effective 05/06/26. Enforcement -- Rulemaking.(1)The division shall administer and enforce the provisions of this part.(2)The division may, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, make rules:(a)establishing the time period, format, and content requirements for records maintained under Section 13-82-104; and(b)establishing the form, content, filing date, and submission procedures for the report described in Section 13-82-105.(3)(a)In addition to the division's enforcement powers under Title 13, Chapter 2, Division of Consumer Protection:(i)the division director may impose an administrative fine of up to $2,500 for each violation of this part; and(ii)the division may bring an action in court to enforce a provision of this part.(b)In a court action by the division to enforce a provision of this part, the court may:(i)declare that the act or practice violates a provision of this part;(ii)enjoin actions that violate this part;(iii)order disgorgement of any money received in violation of this part;(iv)order payment of disgorged money to an injured purchaser or consumer;(v)impose a civil penalty of up to $2,500 for each violation of this part;(vi)award actual damages to an injured purchaser or consumer; and(vii)award any other relief that the court deems reasonable and necessary.(c)If a court grants judgment or injunctive relief to the division, the court shall award the division:(i)reasonable attorney fees;(ii)court costs; and(iii)investigative fees.(4)(a)A person who violates an administrative or court order issued for a violation of this part is subject to a civil penalty of no more than $5,000 for each violation.(b)A civil penalty authorized under this section may be imposed in a civil action.(5)A violation of this part constitutes a deceptive act or practice under Title 13, Chapter 11, Utah Consumer Sales Practices Act.

Section 10:
Section 10. Section 53-6-102 is amended to read:53-6-102Effective 05/06/26. Definitions.As used in this chapter:(1)"Addiction" means the unlawful or habitual use of alcohol or a controlled substance which endangers public health and safety.(2)"Certified academy" means a peace officer training institution certified in accordance with the standards developed under Section 53-6-105.(3)"Council" means the Peace Officer Standards and Training Council created in Section 53-6-106."Commission" means the State Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice created in Section 63M-7-201.(4)"Conviction" means an adjudication of guilt regarding criminal conduct, including:(a)a finding of guilt by a court or a jury;(b)a guilty plea;(c)a plea of nolo contendere;(d)a plea which is held in abeyance pending the successful completion of:(i)a probationary period; or(ii)a diversion agreement; or(e)a conviction which has been expunged or dismissed.(5)"Council" means the Peace Officer Standards and Training Council created in Section 53-6-106.(6)"Cryptocurrency" means a digital asset that functions as a medium of exchange, a unit of account, or a store of value, and is secured by cryptography.(7)"Cryptocurrency investigation" means a law enforcement investigation involving the tracing, analysis, or recovery of cryptocurrency or digital assets.(8)"Digital asset" means the same as that term is defined in Section 13-62-101.(5)(9)"Director" means the director of the Peace Officer Standards and Training Division appointed under Section 53-6-104.(6)(10)"Dispatcher" means an employee of a public safety agency of the state or any of its political subdivisions and whose primary duties are to:(a)(i)receive calls for one or a combination of, emergency police, fire, and medical services, and to dispatch the appropriate personnel and equipment in response to the calls; and(ii)in response to emergency calls, make urgent decisions affecting the life, health, and welfare of the public and public safety employees; or(b)supervise dispatchers or direct a dispatch communication center.(7)(11)"Division" means the Peace Officer Standards and Training Division created in Section 53-6-103.(8)(12)"POST" means the division.

Section 11:
Section 11. Section 53-6-202 is amended to read:53-6-202Effective 05/06/26. Basic training course -- Completion required -- Annual training -- Prohibition from exercising powers -- Reinstatement.(1)(a)The director shall:(i)(A)suggest and prepare subject material; and(B)schedule instructors for basic training courses; or(ii)review the material and instructor choices submitted by a certified academy.(b)The subject material, instructors, and schedules shall be approved or disapproved by a majority vote of the council.(2)The materials shall be reviewed and approved by the council on or before July 1st of each year and may from time to time be changed or amended by majority vote of the council.(3)The basic training in a certified academy:(a)shall be appropriate for the basic training of peace officers in the techniques of law enforcement in the discretion of the director; (b)may not include the use of chokeholds, carotid restraints, or any act that impedes the breathing or circulation of blood likely to produce a loss of consciousness, as a valid method of restraint; and(c)shall include instruction on identifying, responding to, and reporting a criminal offense that is motivated by a personal attribute as that term is defined in Section 76-3-203.14.(4)(a)All peace officers shall satisfactorily complete the basic training course or the waiver process provided for in this chapter as well as annual certified training of not less than 40 hours as the director, with the advice and consent of the council, directs.(b)A peace officer who fails to satisfactorily complete the annual training described in Subsection (4)(a) shall automatically be prohibited from exercising peace officer powers until any deficiency is made up.(c)The annual training described in Subsection (4)(a) shall include training focused on arrest control and de-escalation training.(5)(a)Beginning July 1, 2024, all peace officers who are currently employed shall participate in a training at least every three years focused on the following:(i)mental health and other crisis intervention responses;(ii)intervention responses for mental illnesses, autism spectrum disorder, and other neurological and developmental disorders; and(iii)responses to sexual traumas and investigations of sexual assault and sexual abuse in accordance with Section 53-10-908.(b)Any training in which a peace officer participates as described in Subsection (5)(a) shall count toward the peace officer's 40-hour required annual training described in Subsection (4)(a) for the year in which the peace officer participated in the training.(6)(a)The director or the director's designee, in coordination with the council, shall promulgate the standards for the trainings described in Subsection (4).(b)The chief law enforcement officer or executive officer of the peace officer's employing agency shall determine if a peace officer has complied with the standards established under Subsection (6)(a).(7)(a)Beginning July 1, 2026, each local law enforcement agency shall ensure that at least one peace officer employed by the agency completes specialized cryptocurrency investigation training at least once every three years, focused on:(i)advanced cryptocurrency tracing and blockchain analysis techniques;(ii)digital asset seizure procedures and evidence preservation;(iii)use of cryptocurrency investigation tools and software;(iv)legal requirements for cryptocurrency search warrants and subpoenas;(v)coordination with federal agencies and cryptocurrency exchanges; and(vi)recovery and liquidation of seized digital assets.(b)The director or the director's designee, in coordination with the council, shall create standards for the trainings described in Subsection (7)(a).(c)The chief law enforcement officer or executive officer of the peace officer's employing agency shall determine if a peace officer has complied with the standards created under Subsection (7)(b).(d)A peace officer who completes the specialized training described in Subsection (7)(a) may assist other local law enforcement agencies with cryptocurrency investigations.

Section 12:
Section 12. Section 53-32-101 is enacted to read:32. Cryptocurrency Investigations53-32-101Effective 05/06/26. Definitions.As used in this chapter:(1)"Cryptocurrency" means a digital asset that functions as a medium of exchange, a unit of account, or a store of value, and is secured by cryptography.(2)"Cryptocurrency investigation" means a law enforcement investigation involving the tracing, analysis, or recovery of cryptocurrency or digital assets.(3)"Digital asset" means the same as that term is defined in Section 13-62-101.(4)"Local law enforcement agency" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53-13-101.

Section 13:
Section 13. Section 53-32-102 is enacted to read:53-32-102Effective 05/06/26. Cryptocurrency investigation reporting.(1)Each local law enforcement agency and the Division of Securities created in Section 61-1-18 shall report the following information to the commission on a quarterly basis:(a)the number of cases involving cryptocurrency opened during the reporting period;(b)the number of cryptocurrency traces conducted during the reporting period;(c)the number of cases involving cryptocurrency closed during the reporting period; and(d)the disposition of closed cases, including:(i)arrests made;(ii)charges filed;(iii)convictions obtained; and(iv)digital assets recovered or seized.(2)The commission shall:(a)collect and analyze the information reported under Subsection (1);(b)prepare an annual summary report of statewide cryptocurrency investigation activities; and(c)on or before November 30 of each year, provide the annual summary report to the Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice Interim Committee.(3)Information reported under this section is protected from disclosure under Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act, if disclosure would compromise an ongoing investigation or reveal investigative techniques.

Section 14:
Section 14. Section 63I-1-253 is amended to read:63I-1-253Effective 05/06/26. Repeal dates: Titles 53 through 53G.(1)Section 53-1-122, Road Rage Awareness and Prevention Restricted Account, is repealed July 1, 2028.(2)Section 53-2a-105, Emergency Management Administration Council created -- Function -- Composition -- Expenses, is repealed July 1, 2029.(3)Section 53-2a-1103, Search and Rescue Advisory Board -- Members -- Compensation, is repealed July 1, 2030.(4)Section 53-2a-1104, General duties of the Search and Rescue Advisory Board, is repealed July 1, 2027.(5)Title 53, Chapter 2a, Part 15, Grid Resilience Committee, is repealed July 1, 2027.(6)Section 53-2d-104, State Emergency Medical Services Committee -- Membership -- Expenses, is repealed July 1, 2029.(7)Section 53-2d-503, Establishment of maximum rates, is repealed July 1, 2027.(8)Section 53-5a-302, Concealed Firearm Review Board -- Membership -- Compensation -- Terms -- Duties, is repealed July 1, 2029.(9)Section 53-11-104, Board, is repealed July 1, 2029.(10)Title 53, Chapter 31, Department Interaction With Local Law Enforcement, is repealed July 1, 2027.(11)Section 53-32-102, Cryptocurrency investigation reporting, is repealed July 1, 2030.(12)Subsection 53C-3-203(4)(b)(vii), regarding the distribution of money from the Land Exchange Distribution Account to the Geological Survey for test wells and other hydrologic studies in the West Desert, is repealed July 1, 2030.(12)(13)Subsection 53E-1-201(1)(q), regarding the Higher Education and Corrections Council, is repealed July 1, 2027.(13)(14)Subsection 53E-2-304(6), regarding foreclosing a private right of action or waiver of governmental immunity, is repealed July 1, 2027.(14)(15)Subsection 53E-3-503(5), regarding coordinating councils for youth in care, is repealed July 1, 2027.(15)(16)Subsection 53E-3-503(6), regarding coordinating councils for youth in care, is repealed July 1, 2027.(16)(17)Subsection 53E-4-202(8)(b), regarding a standards review committee, is repealed January 1, 2028.(17)(18)Section 53E-4-203, Standards review committee, is repealed January 1, 2028.(18)(19)Title 53E, Chapter 6, Part 5, Utah Professional Practices Advisory Commission, is repealed July 1, 2033.(19)(20)Subsection 53E-7-207(7), regarding a private right of action or waiver of governmental immunity, is repealed July 1, 2027.(20)(21)Section 53F-5-215, Elementary teacher preparation assessment grant, is repealed July 1, 2028.(21)(22)Section 53F-5-219, Local Innovations Civics Education Pilot Program, is repealed July 1, 2026.(22)(23)Title 53F, Chapter 10, Part 2, Capital Projects Evaluation Panel, is repealed July 1, 2027.(23)(24)Subsection 53G-4-608(2)(b), regarding the Utah Seismic Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2025.(24)(25)Subsection 53G-4-608(4)(b), regarding the Utah Seismic Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2025.(25)(26)Section 53G-9-212, Drinking water quality in schools, is repealed July 1, 2027.(26)(27)Subsection 53G-9-703(4), regarding the parental video presentation concerning student use of technology, is repealed January 1, 2030.(27)(28)Subsection 53H-1-402(1)(j), regarding the Higher Education and Corrections Council, is repealed July 1, 2027.(28)(29)Section 53H-1-604, Higher Education and Corrections Council, is repealed July 1, 2027.(29)(30)Subsection 53H-4-210(3), regarding the creation of the SafeUT and School Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2030.(30)(31)Subsection 53H-4-210(4), regarding the appointment of the members of the SafeUT and School Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2030.(31)(32)Subsection 53H-4-210(5), regarding the attorney general designating the chair of the SafeUT and School Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2030.(32)(33)Subsection 53H-4-210(6), regarding the quorum requirements of the SafeUT and School Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2030.(33)(34)Subsection 53H-4-210(7), regarding a formal action of the SafeUT and School Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2030.(34)(35)Subsection 53H-4-210(8), regarding compensation for members of the SafeUT and School Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2030.(35)(36)Subsection 53H-4-210(9), regarding the support staff for the SafeUT and School Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2030.(36)(37)Section 53H-4-306.1, Definitions -- Electrification of Transportation Infrastructure Research Center, is repealed July 1, 2028.(37)(38)Section 53H-4-306.2, Electrification of Transportation Infrastructure Research Center -- Designation -- Duties, is repealed July 1, 2028.(38)(39)Section 53H-4-306.3, Electrification of Transportation Infrastructure Research Center -- Steering committee, is repealed July 1, 2028.(39)(40)Section 53H-4-306.4, Electrification of Transportation Infrastructure Research Center -- Industry advisory board, is repealed July 1, 2028.(40)(41)Section 53H-4-306.5, Electrification of Transportation Infrastructure Research Center -- Duties of the project director, is repealed July 1, 2028.(41)(42)Section 53H-4-306.6, Electrification of Transportation Infrastructure Research Center -- Project development and strategic objectives -- Reporting requirements, is repealed July 1, 2028.(42)(43)Section 53H-4-307.1, Center for Civic Excellence, is repealed July 1, 2030.(43)(44)Section 53H-4-307.2, Center for Civic Excellence -- Duties -- Authority, is repealed July 1, 2030.(44)(45)Section 53H-4-307.3, Center for Civic Excellence -- Leadership, is repealed July 1, 2030.(45)(46)Section 53H-4-307.4, Center for Civic Excellence -- Faculty, is repealed July 1, 2030.(46)(47)Section 53H-4-307.5, Center for Civic Excellence -- Curriculum, is repealed July 1, 2030.(47)(48)Section 53H-4-307.6, Center for Civic Excellence -- Oversight -- Reporting, is repealed July 1, 2030.(48)(49)Section 53H-4-313, Food Security Council, is repealed July 1, 2027.(49)(50)Section 53H-8-305, Five-year performance goals, is repealed July 1, 2027.(50)(51)Title 53H, Chapter 10, Part 4, Education Savings Incentive Program, is repealed July 1, 2028.

Section 15:
Section 15.  Effective Date.(1)Except as provided in Subsection (2), this bill takes effect May 6, 2026.(2)The actions affecting Section 13-2-1 Effective 07/01/26 take effect on July 1, 2026.